Nebraska, session 109, LB346.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 2-1801, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
2-1801 Sections 2-1801 to 2-1811 may be cited as the Nebraska Potato
Development Act. The act terminates on July 1, 2026.
Sec. 2. Section 2-1803, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
2-1803 (1) With the exception of the ex officio member, the Governor shall
appoint an advisory committee to be known as the Nebraska Potato Development
Committee. The committee shall be composed of three shippers and four growers
from the industry and the vice chancellor of the University of Nebraska
Institute of Agriculture and Natural Resources who shall be an ex officio
member. The Director of Agriculture shall be the chairperson. The committee
shall adopt and provide rules and regulations for the conduct of the affairs of
the Division of Potato Development and advise the director regarding the
appointment of the division head and any assistants as may be appointed. The
members of the committee shall serve without pay but shall receive expenses
incurred while on official business as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.
As the terms of office of such appointees expire, successors shall be appointed
-1-

LB346 LB346
2025 2025
by the Governor for a period of two years and until their successors are
appointed and qualified.
(2) The Nebraska Potato Development Committee terminates on July 1, 2026.
Sec. 3. Section 2-1826, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
2-1826 This section terminates on July 1, 2026. The Nebraska Potato
Development Act and the Nebraska Potato Inspection Act shall become one act in
two parts with the Nebraska Potato Development Act designated as Part I and the
Nebraska Potato Inspection Act designated as Part II thereof and the Revisor of
Statutes shall make appropriate changes in the statutes necessitated by such
redesignation.
Sec. 4. Section 2-4901, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
2-4901 (1) The Climate Assessment Response Committee is hereby created.
The office of the Governor shall be the lead agency and shall oversee the
committee and its activities. The committee shall be composed of
representatives appointed by the Governor with the approval of a majority of
the Legislature from livestock producers, crop producers, the Nebraska
Emergency Management Agency, and the Conservation and Survey Division and
Cooperative Extension Service of the University of Nebraska. The Director of
Agriculture or his or her designee, the chief executive officer of the
Department of Health and Human Services or his or her designee, and the
Director of Natural Resources or his or her designee shall be ex officio
members of the committee. Representatives from the federal Consolidated Farm
Service Agency and Federal Crop Insurance Corporation may also serve on the
committee at the invitation of the Governor. The chairperson of the Committee
on Agriculture of the Legislature and the chairperson of the Committee on
Natural Resources of the Legislature shall be nonvoting, ex officio members of
the committee. The Governor may appoint a member of the Governor's Policy
Research Office and any other state agency representatives or invite any other
federal agencies to name representatives as he or she deems necessary. The
Governor shall appoint one of the Climate Assessment Response Committee members
to serve as the chairperson of the committee. Committee members shall be
reimbursed for expenses as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.
(2) The committee shall meet at least twice each year and shall meet more
frequently (a) at the call of the chairperson, (b) upon request of a majority
of the committee members, and (c) during periods of drought or other severe
climate situations.
(3) The chairperson may establish subcommittees and may invite
representatives of agencies other than those with members on the committee to
serve on such subcommittees.
(4) Any funds for the activities of the committee and for other climate-
related expenditures may be appropriated directly to the office of the Governor
for contracting with other agencies or persons for tasks approved by the
committee.
(5) The Climate Assessment Response Committee terminates on July 1, 2026.
Sections 2-4901 and 2-4902 terminate on July 1, 2026.
Sec. 5. Section 2-5001, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
2-5001 Sections 2-5001 to 2-5006 terminate on July 1, 2026. The
Legislature finds that it is in the interest of the people of the state that
the practice of aquaculture be encouraged in order to promote agricultural
diversification, augment food supplies, expand employment opportunities,
promote economic activity, increase stocks of fish and other aquatic life,
protect and better use and manage the natural resources of the state, and
provide other benefits to the state.
Sec. 6. Section 2-5003, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
2-5003 There is hereby created the Nebraska Aquaculture Board. The board
shall consist of (1) one employee of the commission who is familiar with
aquatic disease, appointed by the secretary of the commission, (2) one employee
of the department appointed by the director, (3) three aquaculturists,
appointed by the Governor, and (4) a representative of an industry or product
which is related to or used in aquaculture, appointed by the Governor. The
board shall elect from its members a chairperson. The terms of the members of
the board shall be three years, except that the terms of the initial
aquaculturist members of the board appointed by the Governor shall be staggered
so that one member is appointed for a term of one year, one for a term of two
years, and one for a term of three years, as determined by the Governor.
Members appointed under subdivisions (3) and (4) of this section shall be
reimbursed for expenses as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.
The Nebraska Aquaculture Board terminates on July 1, 2026.
Sec. 7. Section 38-167, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
38-167 (1) Boards shall be designated as follows:
(a) Prior to July 1, 2026, Board of Advanced Practice Registered Nurses;
(b) Prior to July 1, 2026, Board of Alcohol and Drug Counseling;
(c) Board of Athletic Training;
(d) Board of Audiology and Speech-Language Pathology;
(e) Board of Behavior Analysts;
(f) Board of Chiropractic;
(g) Board of Cosmetology, Electrology, Esthetics, Nail Technology, and
Body Art;
-2-

LB346 LB346
2025 2025
(h) Board of Dentistry;
(i) Board of Emergency Medical Services;
(j) Board of Registered Environmental Health Specialists;
(k) Board of Funeral Directing and Embalming;
(l) Board of Hearing Instrument Specialists;
(m) Board of Massage Therapy;
(n) Board of Medical Nutrition Therapy;
(o) Board of Medical Radiography;
(p) Board of Medicine and Surgery;
(q) Board of Mental Health Practice;
(r) Board of Nursing;
(s) Board of Nursing Home Administration;
(t) Board of Occupational Therapy Practice;
(u) Board of Optometry;
(v) Board of Pharmacy;
(w) Board of Physical Therapy;
(x) Board of Podiatry;
(y) Board of Psychology;
(z) Board of Respiratory Care Practice; and
(aa) Board of Veterinary Medicine and Surgery.
(2) Any change made by the Legislature of the names of boards listed in
this section shall not change the membership of such boards or affect the
validity of any action taken by or the status of any action pending before any
of such boards. Any such board newly named by the Legislature shall be the
direct and only successor to the board as previously named.
Sec. 8. Section 38-204, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
38-204 Prior to July 1, 2026, board Board means the Board of Advanced
Practice Registered Nurses. Beginning July 1, 2026, board means the Board of
Nursing.
Sec. 9. Section 38-205, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
38-205 (1) The Board of Advanced Practice Registered Nurses terminates on
July 1, 2026. This section terminates on July 1, 2026. Until July 1, 2007, the
board shall consist of (a) five advanced practice registered nurses
representing different advanced practice registered nurse specialties for which
a license has been issued, (b) five physicians licensed under the Uniform
Licensing Law to practice medicine in Nebraska, at least three of whom shall
have a current collaborating relationship with an advanced practice registered
nurse, (c) three consumer members, and (d) one licensed pharmacist.
(2) Prior to July 1, 2026 On and after July 1, 2007, the board shall
consist of:
(a) One nurse practitioner holding a license under the Nurse Practitioner
Practice Act, one certified nurse midwife holding a license under the Certified
Nurse Midwifery Practice Act, one certified registered nurse anesthetist
holding a license under the Certified Registered Nurse Anesthetist Practice
Act, and one clinical nurse specialist holding a license under the Clinical
Nurse Specialist Practice Act, except that the initial clinical nurse
specialist appointee may be a clinical nurse specialist practicing pursuant to
the Nurse Practice Act as such act existed prior to July 1, 2007. Of the
initial appointments under this subdivision, one shall be for a two-year term,
one shall be for a three-year term, one shall be for a four-year term, and one
shall be for a five-year term. All subsequent appointments under this
subdivision shall be for five-year terms;
(b) Three physicians, one of whom shall have a professional relationship
with a nurse practitioner, one of whom shall have a professional relationship
with a certified nurse midwife, and one of whom shall have a professional
relationship with a certified registered nurse anesthetist. Of the initial
appointments under this subdivision, one shall be for a three-year term, one
shall be for a four-year term, and one shall be for a five-year term. All
subsequent appointments under this subdivision shall be for five-year terms;
and
(c) Two public members. Of the initial appointments under this
subdivision, one shall be for a three-year term, and one shall be for a four-
year term. All subsequent appointments under this subdivision shall be for
five-year terms.
(3) Members of the board serving immediately before July 1, 2007, shall
serve until members are appointed and qualified under subsection (2) of this
section.
Sec. 10. Section 38-308, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
38-308 Prior to July 1, 2026, board Board means the Board of Alcohol and
Drug Counseling. Beginning July 1, 2026, board means the Board of Mental Health
Practice.
Sec. 11. Section 38-310, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
38-310 (1) Membership on the board shall consist of seven professional
members and two public members appointed pursuant to section 38-158. The
members shall meet the requirements of sections 38-164 and 38-165. Three of the
professional members shall be licensed alcohol and drug counselors who may also
be licensed as psychologists or mental health practitioners, three of the
professional members shall be licensed alcohol and drug counselors who are not
licensed as psychologists or mental health practitioners, and one of the
-3-

LB346 LB346
2025 2025
professional members shall be a psychiatrist, psychologist, or mental health
practitioner.
(2) The Board of Alcohol and Drug Counseling terminates on July 1, 2026.
This section terminates on July 1, 2026.
Sec. 12. Section 38-605, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
38-605 Prior to July 1, 2026, board Board means the Board of Advanced
Practice Registered Nurses. Beginning July 1, 2026, board means the Board of
Nursing.
Sec. 13. Section 38-703, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
38-703 Prior to July 1, 2026, board Board means the Board of Advanced
Practice Registered Nurses. Beginning July 1, 2026, board means the Board of
Nursing.
Sec. 14. Section 38-904, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
38-904 Prior to July 1, 2026, board Board means the Board of Advanced
Practice Registered Nurses. Beginning July 1, 2026, board means the Board of
Nursing.
Sec. 15. Section 38-2120, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
38-2120 (1) This subsection applies prior to July 1, 2026. The board shall
consist of nine professional members and two public members appointed pursuant
to section 38-158. The members shall meet the requirements of sections 38-164
and 38-165. Two professional members shall be certified master social workers,
two professional members shall be certified professional counselors, two
professional members shall be certified marriage and family therapists, one
professional member shall be a certified art therapist, and two professional
members shall be licensed mental health practitioners that do not hold an
associated certification.
(2) Beginning July 1, 2026, the board shall consist of eleven professional
members and three public members appointed pursuant to section 38-158. The
members shall meet the requirements of sections 38-164 and 38-165. Two
professional members shall be certified master social workers, two professional
members shall be certified professional counselors, two professional members
shall be certified marriage and family therapists, one professional member
shall be a certified art therapist, two professional members shall be licensed
mental health practitioners that do not hold an associated certification, and
two professional members shall be licensed alcohol and drug counselors.
Sec. 16. Section 38-2213, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
38-2213 (1) Prior to July 1, 2026, the The board shall consist of eight
registered nurse members, two licensed practical nurse members, and two public
members. The registered nurses on the board shall be from the following areas:
(a) One practical nurse educator; (b) one associate degree or diploma nurse
educator; (c) one baccalaureate nurse educator; (d) two nursing service
administrators; (e) two staff nurses; and (f) one advanced practice registered
nurse.
(2) Beginning July 1, 2026, the board shall consist of ten registered
nurse members, two licensed practical nurse members, and three public members.
The registered nurses on the board shall be from the following areas: (a) One
practical nurse educator; (b) one associate degree or diploma nurse educator;
(c) one baccalaureate nurse educator; (d) one nursing service administrator (e)
two staff nurses; and (f) four advanced practice registered nurses.
(3) (2) The State Board of Health shall attempt to ensure that the
membership of the Board of Nursing is representative of acute care, long-term
care, and community-based care. A minimum of three and a maximum of five
members shall be appointed from each congressional district, and each member
shall have been a bona fide resident of the congressional district from which
he or she is appointed for a period of at least one year prior to the time of
the appointment of such member.
Sec. 17. Section 38-2214, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
38-2214 (1) Each licensed practical nurse educator on the board shall (a)
be a registered nurse currently licensed in the state, (b) have graduated with
a graduate degree in nursing or a related field of study, (c) have had a
minimum of five years' experience in administration, teaching, or consultation
in practical nurse education, and (d) be currently employed as a practical
nurse educator.
(2) Each associate degree or diploma nurse educator on the board and the
baccalaureate nurse educator on the board shall (a) be a registered nurse
currently licensed in the state, (b) have graduated with a graduate degree in
nursing, (c) have had a minimum of five years' experience in administration,
teaching, or consultation in nursing education, and (d) be currently employed
in the field being represented.
(3) Each staff nurse on the board shall (a) be a registered nurse
currently licensed in the state, (b) have had a minimum of five years'
experience in nursing, and (c) be currently employed as a staff nurse in the
provision of patient care services.
(4) Each nursing service administrator on the board shall (a) be a
registered nurse currently licensed in the state, (b) have had a minimum of
five years' experience in nursing service administration, and (c) be currently
employed in such field.
-4-

LB346 LB346
2025 2025
(5) Each licensed practical nurse member shall (a) have completed at least
four years of high school study, (b) be licensed as a licensed practical nurse
in this state, (c) have obtained a certificate or diploma from a state-approved
practical nursing program, (d) have been actively engaged in practical nursing
for at least five years, and (e) be currently employed in the provision of
patient care services as a licensed practical nurse in the state.
(6) Each public member shall meet the requirements of section 38-165.
(7)(a) Each (7) The advanced practice registered nurse on the board shall
(i) (a) have a minimum of five years' experience as an advanced practice
registered nurse, (ii) (b) be currently employed as an advanced practice
registered nurse, and (iii) (c) be licensed as an advanced practice registered
nurse.
(b) Beginning July 1, 2026, the preferred representation of the advanced
practice registered nurses on the board includes one certified registered nurse
anesthetist, one nurse practitioner, one clinical nurse specialist, and one
certified nurse midwife. If such representation is not possible, any vacancy
under subdivision (2)(f) of section 38-2213 may be filled based on the
composition of the applicant pool for the vacant advanced practice registered
nurse position on the board.
(c) The appointment of advanced practice registered nurses to fill the
vacancies as of July 1, 2026, shall be made so that one of the four advanced
practice registered nurse members serves until December 1, 2028, one serves
until December 1, 2029, one serves until December 1, 2030, and one serves until
December 1, 2031, or as close thereto as possible. Subsequent appointments of
advanced practice registered nurses shall be for five-year terms as provided in
section 38-163.
(8) Members serving on December 1, 2008, may complete their respective
terms even if they do not meet the requirements for appointment as changed by
Laws 2007, LB 463.
Sec. 18. Section 38-2216, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
38-2216 In addition to the duties listed in sections 38-126 and 38-161,
the board shall:
(1) Adopt reasonable and uniform standards for nursing practice and
nursing education;
(2) If requested, issue or decline to issue advisory opinions defining
acts which in the opinion of the board are or are not permitted in the practice
of nursing. Such opinions shall be considered informational only and are
nonbinding. Practice-related information provided by the board to registered
nurses or licensed practical nurses licensed under the Nurse Practice Act shall
be made available by the board on request to nurses practicing in this state
under a license issued by a state that is a party to the Nurse Licensure
Compact;
(3) Establish rules and regulations for approving and classifying programs
preparing nurses, taking into consideration administrative and organizational
patterns, the curriculum, students, student services, faculty, and
instructional resources and facilities, and provide surveys for each
educational program as determined by the board;
(4) Approve educational programs which meet the requirements of the Nurse
Practice Act;
(5) Keep a record of all its proceedings and compile an annual report for
distribution;
(6) Adopt rules and regulations establishing standards for delegation of
nursing activities, including training or experience requirements, competency
determination, and nursing supervision;
(7) Collect data regarding nursing;
(8) Provide consultation and conduct conferences, forums, studies, and
research on nursing practice and education;
(9) Join organizations that develop and regulate the national nursing
licensure examinations and exclusively promote the improvement of the legal
standards of the practice of nursing for the protection of the public health,
safety, and welfare; and
(10) Administer the Nurse Licensure Compact. In reporting information to
the coordinated licensure information system under Article VII of the compact,
the department may disclose personal identifying information about a nurse,
including his or her social security number; and .
(11) Beginning July 1, 2026:
(a) Establish standards for integrated practice agreements between
collaborating physicians and certified nurse midwives;
(b) Monitor the scope of practice by certified nurse midwives, certified
registered nurse anesthetists, clinical nurse specialists, and nurse
practitioners;
(c) Recommend disciplinary action relating to licenses of advanced
practice registered nurses, certified nurse midwives, certified registered
nurse anesthetists, clinical nurse specialists, and nurse practitioners;
(d) Engage in other activities not inconsistent with the Advanced Practice
Registered Nurse Practice Act, the Certified Nurse Midwifery Practice Act, the
Certified Registered Nurse Anesthetist Practice Act, the Clinical Nurse
Specialist Practice Act, and the Nurse Practitioner Practice Act; and
(e) Adopt rules and regulations to implement the Advanced Practice
Registered Nurse Practice Act, the Certified Nurse Midwifery Practice Act, the
Certified Registered Nurse Anesthetist Practice Act, the Clinical Nurse
Specialist Practice Act, and the Nurse Practitioner Practice Act, for
-5-

LB346 LB346
2025 2025
promulgation by the department as provided in section 38-126. Such rules and
regulations shall also include (i) approved certification organizations and
certification programs and (ii) professional liability insurance.
Sec. 19. Section 38-2306, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
38-2306 Prior to July 1, 2026, board Board means the Board of Advanced
Practice Registered Nurses. Beginning July 1, 2026, board means the Board of
Nursing.
Sec. 20. Section 39-2106, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
39-2106 (1) There To assist in developing the functional classification
system, there is hereby established the Board of Public Roads Classifications
and Standards which shall consist of eleven members to be appointed by the
Governor with the approval of the Legislature. The board shall assist in
developing the functional classification system. Beginning July 1, 2026,
another duty of the board shall be to have sole responsibility for overseeing
the County Highway and City Street Superintendents Act.
(2) Of the members of such board:
(a) Two shall be representatives of the Department of Transportation;
(b) Three shall be representatives of the counties. One of such members
shall be a county highway superintendent licensed pursuant to the County
Highway and City Street Superintendents Act and two of such members shall be
county board members;
(c) Three shall be representatives of the municipalities. Prior to July 1,
2026, each Each of such members shall be a city engineer, village engineer,
public works director, city manager, city administrator, street commissioner,
or city street superintendent licensed pursuant to the County Highway and City
Street Superintendents Act. Beginning July 1, 2026, one of such members shall
be a city street superintendent licensed pursuant to the County Highway and
City Street Superintendents Act, and the remaining representatives of
municipalities shall be a city engineer, village engineer, public works
director, city manager, city administrator, street commissioner, or city street
superintendent licensed pursuant to the County Highway and City Street
Superintendents Act; and
(d) Three shall be lay citizens, with one representing each of the three
congressional districts of the state.
(3) The county members on the board shall represent the various classes of
counties, as defined in section 23-1114.01, in the following manner:
(a) One shall be a representative from either a Class 1 or Class 2 county;
(b) One shall be a representative from either a Class 3 or Class 4 county;
and
(c) One shall be a representative from either a Class 5, Class 6, or Class
7 county.
(4) The municipal members of the board shall represent municipalities of
the following sizes by population, as determined by the most recent federal
decennial census or the most recent revised certified count by the United
States Bureau of the Census:
(a) One shall be a representative from a municipality of less than two
thousand five hundred inhabitants;
(b) One shall be a representative from a municipality of two thousand five
hundred to fifty thousand inhabitants; and
(c) One shall be a representative from a municipality of over fifty
thousand inhabitants.
(5) In making such appointments, the Governor shall consult with the
Director-State Engineer and with the appropriate county and municipal officials
and may consult with organizations representing such officials or representing
counties or municipalities as may be appropriate.
(6) At the expiration of the existing term, one member from the county
representatives, the municipal representatives, and the lay citizens shall be
appointed for a term of two years; and two members from the county
representatives, the municipal representatives, and the lay citizens shall be
appointed for terms of four years. One representative from the department shall
be appointed for a two-year term and the other representative shall be
appointed for a four-year term. Thereafter, all such appointments shall be for
terms of four years each.
(7) Members of such board shall receive no compensation for their services
as such, except that the lay members shall receive the same compensation as
members of the State Highway Commission, and all members shall be reimbursed
for expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties as provided
in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177. All expenses of such board shall be paid by the
department.
Sec. 21. Section 39-2301.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
39-2301.01 For purposes of the County Highway and City Street
Superintendents Act, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) Board of examiners means:
(a) Prior to July 1, 2026, the Board of Examiners for County Highway and
City Street Superintendents; and
(b) Beginning July 1, 2026, the Board of Public Roads Classifications and
Standards;
(2) City street superintendent means a person who engages in the practice
of street superintending for an incorporated municipality;
(3) County highway superintendent means a person who engages in the
-6-

LB346 LB346
2025 2025
practice of highway superintending for a county; and
(4) Street or highway superintending means assisting an incorporated
municipality or a county in the following:
(a) Developing and annually updating long-range plans or programs based on
needs and coordinated with adjacent local governmental units;
(b) Developing annual programs for design, construction, and maintenance;
(c) Developing annual budgets based on programmed projects and activities;
(d) Implementing the capital improvements and maintenance activities
provided in the approved plans, programs, and budgets; and
(e) Managing personnel, contractors, and equipment in support of such
planning, programming, budgeting, and implementation operations.
Sec. 22. Section 39-2304, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
39-2304 (1) The Board of Examiners for County Highway and City Street
Superintendents is created. The board terminates on July 1, 2026. The board
shall consist of seven members to be appointed by the Governor. Four of such
members shall be county representatives and three of such members shall be
municipal representatives.
(2)(a) Immediately preceding appointment to the board, each county and
municipal representative shall hold a county highway and city street
superintendent license pursuant to the County Highway and City Street
Superintendents Act.
(b) Of the county representatives, no more than one member shall be
appointed from each class of county as defined in section 23-1114.01.
(c) Of the municipal representatives:
(i) No more than one shall be appointed from each congressional district;
(ii) One shall be a representative of a city of the metropolitan class,
primary class, or first class;
(iii) One shall be a representative of a city of the second class; and
(iv) One shall be a representative of a village.
(3) In making such appointments, the Governor may give consideration to
the following lists of persons licensed pursuant to the County Highway and City
Street Superintendents Act:
(a) A list of county engineers, county highway superintendents, and county
surveyors submitted by the Nebraska Association of County Officials; and
(b) A list of city street superintendents, city managers, city
administrators, street commissioners, city engineers, village engineers, and
public works directors submitted by the League of Nebraska Municipalities.
(4) Two county representatives shall initially be appointed for terms of
two years each, and two county representatives shall initially be appointed for
terms of four years each. One municipal representative shall initially be
appointed for a term of two years, and two municipal representatives shall
initially be appointed for terms of four years each. Thereafter, all such
appointments shall be for terms of four years each.
(5) In the event a county or municipal representative loses his or her
county highway and city street superintendent license, such person shall no
longer be qualified to serve on the board and such seat shall be vacant. In the
event of a vacancy occurring on the board for any reason, such vacancy shall be
filled by appointment by the Governor for the remainder of the unexpired term.
Such appointed person shall meet the same requirements and qualifications as
the member whose vacancy he or she is filling.
(6) Members of the board shall receive no compensation for their services
as members of the board but shall be reimbursed for expenses incurred while
engaged in the performance of their official duties as provided in sections
81-1174 to 81-1177.
(7) This section terminates on July 1, 2026.
Sec. 23. Section 43-3401, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
43-3401 (1) The Early Childhood Interagency Coordinating Council is
created. The council shall advise and assist the collaborating agencies in
carrying out the provisions of the Early Intervention Act, the Quality Child
Care Act, sections 79-1101 to 79-1104, and other early childhood care and
education initiatives under state supervision. Membership and activities of the
council shall comply with all applicable provisions of federal law. Beginning
July 1, 2026, there shall be sixteen members of the council. Members of the
council shall be appointed by the Governor and shall include, but not be
limited to:
(a) (1) Parents of children who require early intervention services, early
childhood special education, or and other early childhood care and education
services; and
(b) (2) Representatives of school districts, social services, health and
medical services, family child care programs, and center-based early childhood
care and education programs, agencies providing training to staff of child care
programs, resource and referral agencies, mental health services, developmental
disabilities services, educational service units, Head Start, higher education,
physicians, the Legislature, business persons, and the collaborating agencies.
(2) Terms of the members shall be for three years, and a member shall not
serve more than two consecutive three-year terms. Members shall be reimbursed
for expenses as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177, including child care
expenses, with funds provided for such purposes through the Early Intervention
Act, the Quality Child Care Act, and sections 79-1101 to 79-1104.
(3) Members of the Nebraska Interagency Coordinating Council serving on
July 13, 2000, shall constitute the Early Childhood Interagency Coordinating
-7-

LB346 LB346
2025 2025
Council and shall serve for the remainder of their terms. The Governor shall
make additional appointments as required by this section and to fill vacancies
as needed. The Governor shall set the initial terms of additional appointees to
result in staggered terms for members of the council.
(4) The Department of Health and Human Services and the State Department
of Education shall provide and coordinate staff assistance to the council.
Sec. 24. Section 43-4001, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
43-4001 (1) The Children's Behavioral Health Task Force is created. The
task force terminates on July 1, 2026. The task force shall consist of the
following members:
(a) The chairperson of the Health and Human Services Committee of the
Legislature or another member of the committee as his or her designee;
(b) The chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Legislature or
another member of the committee as his or her designee;
(c) Two providers of community-based behavioral health services to
children, appointed by the chairperson of the Health and Human Services
Committee of the Legislature;
(d) One regional administrator appointed under section 71-808, appointed
by the chairperson of the Health and Human Services Committee of the
Legislature;
(e) Two representatives of organizations advocating on behalf of consumers
of children's behavioral health services and their families, appointed by the
chairperson of the Health and Human Services Committee of the Legislature;
(f) One juvenile court judge, appointed by the Chief Justice of the
Supreme Court; and
(g) The probation administrator or his or her designee.
(2) Members of the task force shall serve without compensation but shall
be reimbursed from the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund for expenses as provided
in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.
(3) The chairperson of the Health and Human Services Committee of the
Legislature or his or her designee shall serve as chairperson of the task
force. Administrative and staff support for the task force shall be provided by
the Health and Human Services Committee of the Legislature and the
Appropriations Committee of the Legislature.
(4) This section terminates on July 1, 2026.
Sec. 25. Section 43-4203, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
43-4203 (1) The Nebraska Children's Commission shall create a committee to
examine the Office of Juvenile Services and the Juvenile Services Division of
the Office of Probation Administration. Such committee shall review the role
and effectiveness of out-of-home placements utilized in the juvenile justice
system, including the youth rehabilitation and treatment centers, and make
recommendations to the commission on the juvenile justice continuum of care,
including what populations should be served in out-of-home placements and what
treatment services should be provided at the centers in order to appropriately
serve those populations. Such committee shall also review how mental and
behavioral health services are provided to juveniles in residential placements
and the need for such services throughout Nebraska and make recommendations to
the commission relating to those systems of care in the juvenile justice
system. The committee shall collaborate with the Juvenile Justice Institute at
the University of Nebraska at Omaha, the Center for Health Policy at the
University of Nebraska Medical Center, the behavioral health regions as
established in section 71-807, and state and national juvenile justice experts
to develop recommendations. The recommendations shall include a plan to
implement a continuum of care in the juvenile justice system to meet the needs
of Nebraska families, including specific recommendations for the rehabilitation
and treatment model. The recommendations shall be delivered to the commission
and electronically to the Judiciary Committee of the Legislature annually by
September 1.
(2) The commission shall collaborate with juvenile justice specialists of
the Office of Probation Administration and county officials with respect to any
county-operated practice model participating in the Crossover Youth Program of
the Center for Juvenile Justice Reform at Georgetown University.
(3) The commission shall analyze case management workforce issues and make
recommendations to the Health and Human Services Committee of the Legislature
regarding:
(a) Salary comparisons with other states and the current pay structure
based on job descriptions;
(b) Utilization of incentives for persons who work in the area of child
welfare;
(c) Evidence-based training requirements for persons who work in the area
of child welfare and their supervisors; and
(d) Collaboration with the University of Nebraska to increase and sustain
such workforce.
(4) The Foster Care Reimbursement Rate Committee created pursuant to
section 43-4216, the Nebraska Strengthening Families Act Committee created
pursuant to section 43-4716, and the Bridge to Independence Advisory Committee
created pursuant to section 43-4513 shall be under the jurisdiction of the
commission. The Foster Care Reimbursement Rate Committee and the Bridge to
Independence Advisory Committee terminate on July 1, 2026, and the commission
shall take over their duties pursuant to sections 43-4215, 43-4217, and
43-4513.
-8-

LB346 LB346
2025 2025
(5) The commission shall work with the office of the State Court
Administrator, as appropriate, and entities which coordinate facilitated
conferencing as described in section 43-247.03.
(6) The commission shall work with administrators from each of the service
areas designated pursuant to section 81-3116, the teams created pursuant to
section 28-728, local foster care review boards, child advocacy centers, the
teams created pursuant to the Supreme Court's Through the Eyes of the Child
Initiative, community stakeholders, and advocates for child welfare programs
and services to establish networks in each of such service areas. Such networks
shall permit collaboration to strengthen the continuum of services available to
child welfare agencies and to provide resources for children and juveniles
outside the child protection system.
(7) The commission may organize subcommittees as it deems necessary.
Members of the subcommittees may be members of the commission or may be
individuals who have knowledge of the subcommittee's subject matter,
professional expertise to assist the subcommittee in completing its assigned
responsibilities, or the ability to collaborate within the subcommittee and
with the commission to carry out the powers and duties of the commission. A
subcommittee shall meet as necessary to complete the work delegated by the
commission and shall report its findings to the relevant committee within the
commission.
(8) No member of any committee or subcommittee created pursuant to this
section shall have any private financial interest, profit, or benefit from any
work of such committee or subcommittee.
Sec. 26. Section 43-4216, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
43-4216 (1) The Foster Care Reimbursement Rate Committee is created. The
committee shall be convened at least once every four years. The committee
terminates on July 1, 2026.
(2) The Foster Care Reimbursement Rate Committee shall consist of no fewer
than nine members, including:
(a) The following voting members: (i) Representatives from a child welfare
agency that contracts directly with foster parents, from each of the service
areas designated pursuant to section 81-3116; (ii) a representative from an
advocacy organization which deals with legal and policy issues that include
child welfare; (iii) a representative from an advocacy organization, the
singular focus of which is issues impacting children; (iv) a representative
from a foster and adoptive parent association; (v) a representative from a lead
agency; (vi) a representative from a child advocacy organization that supports
young adults who were in foster care as children; (vii) a foster parent who
contracts directly with the Department of Health and Human Services; and (viii)
a foster parent who contracts with a child welfare agency; and
(b) The following nonvoting, ex officio members: (i) The chief executive
officer of the Department of Health and Human Services or his or her designee
and (ii) representatives from the Division of Children and Family Services of
the department from each service area designated pursuant to section 81-3116,
including at least one division employee with a thorough understanding of the
current foster care payment system and at least one division employee with a
thorough understanding of the N-FOCUS electronic data collection system. The
nonvoting, ex officio members of the committee may attend committee meetings
and participate in discussions of the committee and shall gather and provide
information to the committee on the policies, programs, and processes of each
of their respective bodies. The nonvoting, ex officio members shall not vote on
decisions or recommendations by the committee.
(3) Members of the committee shall serve for terms of four years and until
their successors are appointed and qualified. The Nebraska Children's
Commission shall appoint the members of the committee and the chairperson of
the committee and may fill vacancies on the committee as they occur.
(4) This section terminates on July 1, 2026.
Sec. 27. Section 43-4406, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
43-4406 On or before each September 15, the department shall report
electronically to the Health and Human Services Committee of the Legislature
the following information regarding child welfare services, with respect to
children served by the department:
(1) The percentage of children served and the allocation of the child
welfare budget, categorized by service area, including:
(a) The percentage of children served, by service area and the
corresponding budget allocation; and
(b) The percentage of children served who are wards of the state and the
corresponding budget allocation;
(2) The number of siblings in out-of-home care placed with siblings as of
the June 30 immediately preceding the date of the report, categorized by
service area;
(3) The number of waivers granted under subsection (2) of section 71-1904;
(4) An update of the information in the report of the Children's
Behavioral Health Task Force pursuant to sections 43-4001 to 43-4003,
including:
(a) The number of children receiving mental health and substance abuse
services annually by the Division of Behavioral Health of the department;
(b) The number of children receiving behavioral health services annually
at the Hastings Regional Center;
(c) The number of state wards receiving behavioral health services as of
-9-

LB346 LB346
2025 2025
September 1 immediately preceding the date of the report;
(d) Funding sources for children's behavioral health services for the
fiscal year ending on the immediately preceding June 30;
(e) Expenditures in the immediately preceding fiscal year by the division,
categorized by category of behavioral health service and by behavioral health
region; and
(f) Expenditures in the immediately preceding fiscal year from the medical
assistance program and CHIP as defined in section 68-969 for mental health and
substance abuse services, for all children and for wards of the state;
(4) (5) The following information as obtained for each service area:
(a) Case manager education, including college degree, major, and level of
education beyond a baccalaureate degree;
(b) Average caseload per case manager;
(c) Average number of case managers per child during the preceding twelve
months;
(d) Average number of case managers per child for children who have been
in the child welfare system for three months, for six months, for twelve
months, and for eighteen months and the consecutive yearly average for children
until the age of majority or permanency is attained;
(e) Monthly case manager turnover;
(f) Monthly face-to-face contacts between each case manager and the
children on his or her caseload;
(g) Monthly face-to-face contacts between each case manager and the parent
or parents of the children on his or her caseload;
(h) Case documentation of monthly consecutive team meetings per quarter;
(i) Case documentation of monthly consecutive parent contacts per quarter;
(j) Case documentation of monthly consecutive child contacts with case
manager per quarter;
(k) Case documentation of monthly consecutive contacts between child
welfare service providers and case managers per quarter;
(l) Timeliness of court reports; and
(m) Non-court-involved children, including the number of children served,
the types of services requested, the specific services provided, the cost of
the services provided, and the funding source;
(5) (6) All placements in residential treatment settings made or paid for
by the child welfare system, the Office of Juvenile Services, the State
Department of Education or local education agencies, and the medical assistance
program, including, but not limited to:
(a) Child variables;
(b) Reasons for placement;
(c) The percentage of children denied medicaid-reimbursed services and
denied the level of placement requested;
(d) With respect to each child in a residential treatment setting:
(i) If there was a denial of initial placement request, the length and
level of each placement subsequent to denial of initial placement request and
the status of each child before and immediately after, six months after, and
twelve months after placement;
(ii) Funds expended and length of placements;
(iii) Number and level of placements;
(iv) Facility variables; and
(v) Identification of specific child welfare services unavailable in the
child's community that, if available, could have prevented the need for
residential treatment; and
(e) Identification of child welfare services unavailable in the state
that, if available, could prevent out-of-state placements;
(6) (7) For any individual involved in the child welfare system receiving
a service or a placement through the department or its agent for which referral
is necessary, the date when such referral was made by the department or its
agent and the date and the method by which the individual receiving the
services was notified of such referral. To the extent the department becomes
aware of the date when the individual receiving the referral began receiving
such services, the department or its agent shall document such date;
(7) (8) The number of sexual abuse allegations that occurred for children
being served by the Division of Children and Family Services of the Department
of Health and Human Services and placed at a residential child-caring agency
and the number of corresponding (a) screening decision occurrences by category,
(b) open investigations by category, and (c) agency substantiations, court
substantiations, and court-pending status cases; and
(8) (9) Information on children who are reported or suspected victims of
sex trafficking of a minor or labor trafficking of a minor, as defined in
section 28-830, including:
(a) The number of reports to the statewide toll-free number pursuant to
section 28-711 alleging sex trafficking of a minor or labor trafficking of a
minor and the number of children alleged to be victims;
(b) The number of substantiated victims of sex trafficking of a minor or
labor trafficking of a minor, including demographic information and information
on whether the children were already served by the department;
(c) The number of children determined to be reported or suspected victims
of sex trafficking of a minor or labor trafficking of a minor, including
demographic information and information on whether the children were previously
served by the department;
(d) The types and costs of services provided to children who are reported
or suspected victims of sex trafficking of a minor or labor trafficking of a
-10-

LB346 LB346
2025 2025
minor; and
(e) The number of ongoing cases opened due to allegations of sex
trafficking of a minor or labor trafficking of a minor and number of children
and families served through these cases.
Sec. 28. Section 43-4513, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
43-4513 (1) The Bridge to Independence Advisory Committee is created
within the Nebraska Children's Commission to advise and make recommendations to
the Legislature and the Nebraska Children's Commission regarding ongoing
implementation of the bridge to independence program, extended guardianship
assistance described in section 43-4511, and extended adoption assistance
described in section 43-4512. The Bridge to Independence Advisory Committee
terminates on July 1, 2026, and the Nebraska Children's Commission shall carry
out the duties under this section. The Bridge to Independence Advisory
Committee shall provide a written report regarding ongoing implementation,
including participation in the bridge to independence program, extended
guardianship assistance described in section 43-4511, and extended adoption
assistance described in section 43-4512 and early discharge rates and reasons
obtained from the department, to the Nebraska Children's Commission, the Health
and Human Services Committee of the Legislature, the department, and the
Governor by September 1 of each year. The report to the Health and Human
Services Committee of the Legislature shall be submitted electronically.
(2) The members of the Bridge to Independence Advisory Committee shall
include, but not be limited to, (a) representatives from all three branches of
government, and the representatives from the legislative and judicial branches
of government shall be nonvoting, ex officio members, (b) no less than three
young adults currently or previously in foster care, which may be filled on a
rotating basis by members of Project Everlast or a similar youth support or
advocacy group, (c) one or more representatives from a child welfare advocacy
organization, (d) one or more representatives from a child welfare service
agency, and (e) one or more representatives from an agency providing
independent living services.
(3) Members of the committee shall be appointed for terms of two years.
The Nebraska Children's Commission shall appoint the chairperson of the
committee and may fill vacancies on the committee as they occur.
Sec. 29. Section 66-1605, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
66-1605 Council means the Propane Education and Research Council
established under section sections 66-1617 and 66-1618.
Sec. 30. Section 66-1618, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
66-1618 (1)(a) (1) The council shall be appointed by the Governor within
sixty days after the date the vote is certified to the Governor pursuant to
section 66-1617.
(b) The council shall consist of five nine members, including two four
members representing retail marketers, one member representing wholesalers,
suppliers, and importers, one member representing manufacturers and
distributors of liquefied petroleum gas equipment, one member representing the
academic or propane research community, one propane user or consumer, and the
State Fire Marshal or his or her designee. Other than the State Fire Marshal or
his or her designee and the representatives of the research community and
consumers, members shall be full-time employees or owners of businesses in the
industry or representatives of agriculture cooperatives. Only one person from
any company or an affiliated company may serve on the council at a time. All
members shall be Nebraska residents, except that the members representing
wholesalers, suppliers, and importers and manufacturers and distributors of
liquefied petroleum gas equipment may be residents of other states.
(2) Members of the council shall serve terms of four three years , except
that, of the initial members, three shall be appointed for terms of one year
and three shall be appointed for terms of two years. Members filling unexpired
terms shall be appointed in a manner consistent with this section. Members may
serve a maximum of two consecutive full terms, except that members filling
unexpired terms may serve a maximum of ten seven consecutive years. Members
filling unexpired terms shall be appointed in a manner consistent with this
section. Former members may be reappointed if they have not been members for a
period of two years.
Sec. 31. Section 66-2001, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
66-2001 (1) The Natural Gas Fuel Board is hereby established to advise the
Department of Environment and Energy regarding the promotion of natural gas as
a motor vehicle fuel in Nebraska. The board terminates on July 1, 2026. The
board shall provide recommendations relating to:
(a) Distribution, infrastructure, and workforce development for natural
gas to be used as a motor vehicle fuel;
(b) Loans, grants, and tax incentives to encourage the use of natural gas
as a motor vehicle fuel for individuals and public and private fleets; and
(c) Such other matters as it deems appropriate.
(2) The board shall consist of eight members appointed by the Governor.
The Governor shall make the initial appointments by October 1, 2012. The board
shall include:
(a) One member representing a jurisdictional utility as defined in section
66-1802;
(b) One member representing a metropolitan utilities district;
-11-

LB346 LB346
2025 2025
(c) One member representing the interests of the transportation industry
in the state;
(d) One member representing the interests of the business community in the
state, specifically fueling station owners or operators;
(e) One member representing natural gas marketers or pipelines in the
state;
(f) One member representing automobile dealerships or repair businesses in
the state;
(g) One member representing labor interests in the state; and
(h) One member representing environmental interests in the state,
specifically air quality.
(3) All appointments shall be subject to the approval of a majority of the
members of the Legislature if the Legislature is in session, and if the
Legislature is not in session, any appointment to fill a vacancy shall be
temporary until the next session of the Legislature, at which time a majority
of the members of the Legislature may approve or disapprove such appointment.
(4) Members shall be appointed for terms of four years, except that of the
initial appointees the terms of the members representing a jurisdictional
utility and a metropolitan utilities district shall expire on September 30,
2015, the terms of the members representing the transportation industry, the
business community, natural gas marketers or pipelines, and automobile
dealerships or repair businesses shall expire on September 30, 2014, and the
terms of the members representing labor and environmental interests shall
expire on September 30, 2013. Members may be reappointed. A member shall serve
until a successor is appointed and qualified.
(5) A vacancy on the board shall exist in the event of death, disability,
resignation, or removal for cause of a member. Any vacancy on the board arising
other than from the expiration of a term shall be filled by appointment for the
unexpired portion of the term. An appointment to fill a vacancy shall be made
by the Governor with the approval of a majority of the Legislature, and any
person so appointed shall have the same qualifications as the person whom he or
she succeeds.
(6) The board shall meet at least once annually.
(7) The members shall not be reimbursed for expenses associated with
carrying out their duties as members.
(8) The department shall provide administrative support to the board as
necessary so that the board may carry out its duties.
(9) This section terminates on July 1, 2026.
Sec. 32. Section 71-702, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
71-702 (1) The Women's Health Initiative Advisory Council is created. The
advisory council terminates on July 1, 2026. Prior to July 1, 2026, the
advisory council and shall consist of not more than thirty members, at least
three-fourths of whom are women. At least one member shall be appointed from
the following disciplines: (a) An obstetrician/gynecologist; (b) a nurse
practitioner or physician's assistant from a rural community; (c) a geriatrics
physician or nurse; (d) a pediatrician; (e) a community public health
representative from each congressional district; (f) a health educator; (g) an
insurance industry representative; (h) a mental health professional; (i) a
representative from a statewide health volunteer agency; (j) a private health
care industry representative; (k) an epidemiologist or a health statistician;
(l) a foundation representative; and (m) a woman who is a health care consumer
from each of the following age categories: Eighteen to thirty; thirty-one to
forty; forty-one to sixty-five; and sixty-six and older. The membership shall
also include a representative of the University of Nebraska Medical Center, a
representative from Creighton University Medical Center, the chief medical
officer if one is appointed under section 81-3115, and the Title V
Administrator of the Department of Health and Human Services.
(2) The Governor shall appoint advisory council members and shall consider
and attempt to balance representation based on political party affiliation,
race, and different geographical areas of Nebraska when making appointments.
The Governor shall appoint the first chairperson and vice-chairperson of the
advisory council. There shall be two ex officio, nonvoting members from the
Legislature, one of which shall be the chairperson of the Health and Human
Services Committee.
(3) The terms of the initial members shall be as follows: One-third shall
serve for one-year terms, one-third shall serve for two-year terms, and one-
third shall serve for three-year terms including the members designated
chairperson and vice-chairperson. Thereafter members shall serve for three-year
terms. Members may not serve more than two consecutive three-year terms.
(4) The Governor shall make the appointments within three months after
July 13, 2000.
(5) The advisory council shall meet quarterly the first two years. After
this time the advisory council shall meet at least every six months or upon the
call of the chairperson or a majority of the voting members. A quorum shall be
one-half of the voting members.
(6) The members of the advisory council shall be reimbursed for expenses
as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177 and pursuant to policies of the
advisory council. Funds for reimbursement for expenses shall be from the
Women's Health Initiative Fund.
(7) The advisory council shall advise the Women's Health Initiative of
Nebraska in carrying out its duties under section 71-701 and may solicit
private funds to support the initiative.
-12-

LB346 LB346
2025 2025
Sec. 33. Section 71-705, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
71-705 The Women's Health Initiative Fund is created. The fund terminates
on July 1, 2026. The fund shall consist of money received as gifts or grants or
collected as fees or charges from any federal, state, public, or private
source. Money in the fund shall be used to reimburse the expenses of the
Women's Health Initiative of Nebraska and expenses of members of the Women's
Health Initiative Advisory Council. Nothing in sections 71-701 to 71-707
requires the Women's Health Initiative of Nebraska to accept any private
donations that are not in keeping with the goals and objectives set forth by
the initiative and the Department of Health and Human Services. No funds
expended or received by or through the initiative shall pay for abortion
referral or abortion services. Any money in the fund available for investment
shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska
Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 34. Section 71-706, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
71-706 The Department of Health and Human Services shall have all powers
necessary to implement the purposes and intent of sections 71-701 to 71-707,
including applying for, receiving, and administering federal and other public
and private funds credited to the Women's Health Initiative Fund prior to July
1, 2026. Any funds obtained for the Women's Health Initiative of Nebraska shall
be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Women's Health Initiative
Fund prior to July 1, 2026.
Sec. 35. Section 71-814, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
71-814 (1) The State Advisory Committee on Mental Health Services is
created. Members of the committee shall have a demonstrated interest and
commitment and specialized knowledge, experience, or expertise relating to the
provision of mental health services in the State of Nebraska. The committee
shall consist of twenty-three members appointed by the Governor as follows: (a)
One regional governing board member, (b) one regional administrator, (c) twelve
consumers of behavioral health services or their family members, (d) two
providers of behavioral health services, (e) two representatives from the State
Department of Education, including one representative from the Division of
Vocational Rehabilitation of the State Department of Education, (f) three
representatives from the Department of Health and Human Services representing
mental health, social services, and medicaid, (g) one representative from the
Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice, and (h) one
representative from the Housing Office of the Community and Rural Development
Division of the Department of Economic Development.
(2) The committee shall be responsible to the division and shall (a) serve
as the state's mental health planning council as required by Public Law
102-321, (b) conduct regular meetings, (c) provide advice and assistance to the
division relating to the provision of mental health services and, beginning
July 1, 2026, substance use disorder services in the State of Nebraska,
including, but not limited to, the development, implementation, provision, and
funding of organized peer support services, (d) promote the interests of
consumers and their families, including, but not limited to, their inclusion
and involvement in all aspects of services design, planning, implementation,
provision, education, evaluation, and research, (e) provide reports as
requested by the division, and (f) engage in such other activities as directed
or authorized by the division.
(3) Beginning July 1, 2026, the State Advisory Committee on Mental Health
Services shall also perform the duties of the State Advisory Committee on
Substance Abuse Services.
Sec. 36. Section 71-815, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
71-815 (1) The State Advisory Committee on Substance Abuse Services is
created. The State Advisory Committee on Substance Abuse Services terminates on
July 1, 2026. Members of the committee shall have a demonstrated interest and
commitment and specialized knowledge, experience, or expertise relating to the
provision of substance abuse services in the State of Nebraska. The committee
shall consist of twelve members appointed by the Governor and shall include at
least three consumers of substance abuse services.
(2) The committee shall be responsible to the division and shall (a)
conduct regular meetings, (b) provide advice and assistance to the division
relating to the provision of substance abuse services in the State of Nebraska,
(c) promote the interests of consumers and their families, (d) provide reports
as requested by the division, and (e) engage in such other activities as
directed or authorized by the division.
(3) This section terminates on July 1, 2026.
Sec. 37. Section 71-2454.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
71-2454.01 (1) The Veterinary Prescription Monitoring Program Task Force
is created. The task force shall conduct a study to develop recommendations of
which controlled substances shall be reported by a veterinarian to the
prescription drug monitoring program created under section 71-2454 when
dispensing drugs from a veterinarian’s office or an animal shelter. The study
shall include appropriate methods and procedures of reporting by the
veterinarians with the necessary database field information. The task force
shall utilize nationally available resources afforded by the American
Association of Veterinary State Boards and the Department of State Legislative
-13-

LB346 LB346
2025 2025
and Regulatory Affairs of the American Veterinary Medical Association in
development of the recommendations.
(2) The task force shall consist of at least ten members appointed by the
chairperson of the Health and Human Services Committee of the Legislature as
follows: One member of the Health and Human Services Committee; two at-large
members of the Legislature; three members selected from a list of six
veterinarians provided by the Board of Veterinary Medicine and Surgery, one of
whom is employed by or provides services at an animal shelter; one pharmacist
nominated by the Nebraska Pharmacists Association or its successor
organization; and two members nominated by the Nebraska Veterinary Medical
Association or its successor organization. The task force shall also include a
representative of the prescription drug monitoring program who shall be a
nonvoting member and serve in an advisory capacity only.
(3) The members of the task force shall be appointed within one hundred
twenty days after February 25, 2016. The initial meeting of the task force
shall be convened within one hundred eighty days after February 25, 2016. The
task force shall elect a chairperson and may elect any additional officers from
among its members. All task force members shall serve without compensation.
(4) The task force shall report its findings and recommendations to the
Health and Human Services Committee of the Legislature on or before December 1,
2016.
(5) For purposes of this section, animal shelter has the definition found
in section 54-626.
(6) The Veterinary Prescription Monitoring Program Task Force terminates
on July 1, 2026. This section terminates on July 1, 2026.
Sec. 38. Section 71-5301, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
71-5301 For purposes of the Nebraska Safe Drinking Water Act, unless the
context otherwise requires:
(1) Council means the Advisory Council on Public Water Supply;
(1) (2) Department means the Department of Environment and Energy;
(2) (3) Director means the Director of Environment and Energy or his or
her authorized representative;
(3) (4) Designated agent means any political subdivision or corporate
entity having the demonstrated capability and authority to carry out in whole
or in part the Nebraska Safe Drinking Water Act and with which the director has
consummated a legal and binding contract covering specifically delegated
responsibilities;
(4) (5) Major construction, extension, or alteration means those
structural changes that affect the source of supply, treatment processes, or
transmission of water to service areas but does not include the extension of
service mains within established service areas;
(5) (6) Operator means the individual or individuals responsible for the
continued performance of the water supply system or any part of such system
during assigned duty hours;
(6) (7) Owner means any person owning or operating a public water system;
(7) (8) Person means any individual, corporation, firm, partnership,
limited liability company, association, company, trust, estate, public or
private institution, group, agency, political subdivision, or other entity or
any legal successor, representative, agent, or agency of any of such entities;
(8) (9) Water supply system means all sources of water and their
surroundings under the control of one owner and includes all structures,
conduits, and appurtenances by means of which such water is collected, treated,
stored, or delivered except service pipes between street mains and buildings
and the plumbing within or in connection with the buildings served;
(9)(a) (10)(a) Public water system means a system for providing the public
with water for human consumption through pipes or other constructed
conveyances, if such system has at least fifteen service connections or
regularly serves an average of at least twenty-five individuals daily at least
sixty days per year. Public water system includes (i) any collection,
treatment, storage, and distribution facilities under control of the operator
of such system and used primarily in connection with such system and (ii) any
collection or pretreatment storage facilities not under such control which are
used primarily in connection with such system. Public water system does not
include a special irrigation district. A public water system is either a
community water system or a noncommunity water system.
(b) Service connection does not include a connection to a system that
delivers water by a constructed conveyance other than a pipe if (i) the water
is used exclusively for purposes other than residential uses, consisting of
drinking, bathing, cooking, and other similar uses, (ii) the department
determines that alternative water to achieve the equivalent level of public
health protection provided by the Nebraska Safe Drinking Water Act and rules
and regulations under the act is provided for residential or similar uses for
drinking and cooking, or (iii) the department determines that the water
provided for residential or similar uses for drinking, cooking, and bathing is
centrally treated or treated at the point of entry by the provider, a pass-
through entity, or the user to achieve the equivalent level of protection
provided by the Nebraska Safe Drinking Water Act and the rules and regulations
under the act.
(c) Special irrigation district means an irrigation district in existence
prior to May 18, 1994, that provides primarily agricultural service through a
piped water system with only incidental residential or similar use if the
system or the residential or similar users of the system comply with exclusion
-14-

LB346 LB346
2025 2025
provisions of subdivision (b)(ii) or (iii) of this subdivision;
(10) (11) Drinking water standards means rules and regulations adopted and
promulgated pursuant to section 71-5302 which (a) establish maximum levels for
harmful materials which, in the judgment of the director, may have an adverse
effect on the health of persons and (b) apply only to public water systems;
(11) (12) Lead free means (a) not containing more than two-tenths percent
lead when used with respect to solder and flux and (b) not containing more than
a weighted average of twenty-five hundredths percent lead when used with
respect to the wetted surfaces of pipes, pipe fittings, plumbing fittings, and
fixtures;
(12) (13) Community water system means a public water system that (a)
serves at least fifteen service connections used by year-round residents of the
area served by the system or (b) regularly serves at least twenty-five year-
round residents;
(13) (14) Noncommunity water system means a public water system that is
not a community water system;
(14) (15) Nontransient noncommunity water system means a public water
system that is not a community water system and that regularly serves at least
twenty-five of the same individuals over six months per year; and
(15) (16) Federal Safe Drinking Water Act means the federal Safe Drinking
Water Act, 42 U.S.C. 300f et seq., as the act existed on January 1, 2021.
Sec. 39. Section 71-5310, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
71-5310 (1) The director , with the approval of the council, may authorize
variances or exemptions from the drinking water standards issued pursuant to
section 71-5302 under conditions and in such manner as deemed they deem
necessary and desirable. Prior to July 1, 2026, such variances and exemptions
shall be subject to the approval of the Advisory Council on Public Water
Supply. Such variances or exemptions shall be permitted under conditions and in
a manner which are not less stringent than the conditions under, and the manner
in which, variances and exemptions may be granted under the federal Safe
Drinking Water Act.
(2) Prior to granting a variance or an exemption, the director shall
provide notice, in a newspaper of general circulation serving the area served
by the public water system, of the proposed exemption or variance and that
interested persons may request a public hearing on the proposed exemption or
variance. The director may require the system to provide other appropriate
notice necessary to provide adequate notice to persons served by the system.
(3) If a public hearing is requested, the director shall set a time and
place for the hearing and such hearing shall be held before the department
prior to the variance or exemption being issued. Frivolous and insubstantial
requests for a hearing may be denied by the director. An exemption or variance
shall be conditioned on monitoring, testing, analyzing, or other requirements
to insure the protection of the public health. A variance or an exemption
granted shall include a schedule of compliance under which the public water
system is required to meet each contaminant level or treatment technique
requirement for which a variance or an exemption is granted within a reasonable
time as specified by the director. Prior to July 1, 2026, the director's
determination shall be subject to with the approval of the Advisory Council on
Public Water Supply council.
Sec. 40. Section 71-5311, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
71-5311 (1) There is hereby established the Advisory Council on Public
Water Supply which shall advise and assist the department in administering the
Nebraska Safe Drinking Water Act. The council terminates on July 1, 2026.
(2) The council shall be composed of seven members appointed by the
Governor, (a) one of whom shall be a professional engineer, (b) one of whom
shall be a licensed physician, (c) two of whom shall be consumers of a public
water system, (d) two of whom shall be operators of a public water system who
possess a license issued by the department to operate a public water system.
One such operator shall represent a system serving a population of five
thousand or less, and one such operator shall represent a system serving a
population of more than five thousand, and (e) one of whom shall be, at the
time of appointment, (i) an individual who owns a public water system, (ii) a
member of the governing board of a public or private corporation which owns a
public water system, or (iii) in the case of a political subdivision which owns
a public water system, a member of the subdivision's governing board or board
of public works or similar board which oversees the operation of a public water
system.
(3) All members shall be appointed for three-year terms. No member shall
serve more than three consecutive three-year terms. Each member shall hold
office until the expiration of his or her term or until a successor has been
appointed. Any vacancy occurring in council membership, other than by
expiration of term, shall be filled within sixty days by the Governor by
appointment from the appropriate category for the unexpired term.
(4) The council shall meet not less than once each year. Special meetings
of the council may be called by the director or upon the written request of any
two members of the council explaining the reason for such meeting. The place of
the meeting shall be set by the director. Such officers as the council deems
necessary shall be elected every three years beginning with the first meeting
in the year 1990. A majority of the members of the council shall constitute a
quorum for the transaction of business. Representatives of the department shall
attend each meeting. Every act of the majority of the members of the council
-15-

LB346 LB346
2025 2025
shall be deemed to be the act of the council.
(5) No member of the council shall receive any compensation, but each
member shall be entitled, while serving on the business of the council, to
receive his or her travel and other necessary expenses while so serving away
from his or her place of residence as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.
(6) This section terminates on July 1, 2026.
Sec. 41. Section 71-7012, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
71-7012 The Breast and Cervical Cancer Advisory Committee is established.
The committee terminates on July 1, 2026. The committee consists of the members
of the Mammography Screening Committee serving immediately prior to September
9, 1995, and eight additional members appointed by the chief executive officer
of the department or his or her designee who have expertise or a personal
interest in cervical cancer. The committee shall consist of not more than
twenty-four volunteer members, at least eight of whom are women, appointed by
the chief executive officer or his or her designee. Members of the committee
shall be persons interested in health care, the promotion of breast cancer
screening, and cervical cancer and shall be drawn from both the private sector
and the public sector. At least one member shall be a person who has or who has
had breast cancer.
Of the initial members of the committee, four shall be appointed for terms
of one year and four shall be appointed for terms of two years. Thereafter all
appointments shall be for terms of two years. All members shall serve until
their successors are appointed. No member shall serve more than two successive
two-year terms. Vacancies in the membership of the committee for any cause
shall be filled by appointment by the chief executive officer or his or her
designee for the unexpired term.
Duties of the committee shall include, but not be limited to, encouraging
payment of public and private funds to the Breast and Cervical Cancer Cash
Fund, researching and recommending to the department reimbursement limits,
planning and implementing outreach and educational programs to Nebraska women,
advising the department on its operation of the early detection of breast and
cervical cancer grant from the United States Department of Health and Human
Services, and encouraging payment of public and private funds to the fund.
Members of the committee shall be reimbursed for expenses as provided in
sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.
This section terminates on July 1, 2026.
Sec. 42. Section 71-7102, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
71-7102 For purposes of the Critical Incident Stress Management Act:
(1) Committee means the Interagency Management Committee;
(2) Council means the Critical Incident Stress Management Council;
(1) (3) Critical incident means a traumatic or crisis situation;
(2) (4) Critical incident stress means a strong emotional, cognitive, or
physical reaction which has the potential to interfere with normal functioning,
including physical and emotional illness, loss of interest in the job,
personality changes, marital discord, and loss of ability to function;
(3) (5) Emergency service agency means any law enforcement agency, fire
department, emergency medical service, dispatcher, rescue service, hospital as
defined in section 71-419, or other entity which provides emergency response
services;
(4) (6) Emergency service personnel includes law enforcement personnel,
firefighters, emergency medical services personnel, and hospital personnel; and
(5) (7) Program means the Critical Incident Stress Management Program.
Sec. 43. Section 71-7107, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
71-7107 (1) The Department of Health and Human Services shall be the lead
agency for the program.
(2) Until July 1, 2026, the The department shall:
(a) (1) Provide office support to program activities;
(b) (2) Provide necessary equipment for the program and participants;
(c) (3) Provide staff support to the Critical Incident Stress Management
Council council;
(d) (4) Adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to implement the
program;
(e) (5) Recruit hospital personnel and emergency medical workers to be
trained as critical incident stress management peers;
(f) (6) Participate in the training and continuing education of such peers
and mental health professionals; and
(g) (7) Appoint a director for the program who shall be an employee of the
department and shall be the chairperson of the Interagency Management Committee
committee.
(3) On and after July 1, 2026, the department shall:
(a) Coordinate program activities and emergency response;
(b) Provide necessary equipment for the program and participants;
(c) Recruit hospital personnel and emergency medical workers to be trained
as critical incident stress management peers;
(d) Participate in the training and continuing education of such peers and
mental health professionals;
(e) Appoint a director for the program who shall be an employee of the
department;
(f) Specify the organizational and operational goals for the program and
provide overall policy direction for the program;
-16-

LB346 LB346
2025 2025
(g) Manage planning and budget development for the program;
(h) Manage program development and evaluation;
(i) Provide a mechanism for quality assurance that may include
certification of critical incident stress management team members;
(j) Identify critical incident stress management regions; and
(k) Provide backup to regional critical incident stress management teams.
(4) The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to
implement the program.
Sec. 44. Section 71-7108, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
71-7108 (1) The Department of Health and Human Services shall participate
in the council and committee, recruit mental health workers for each critical
incident stress management region , and participate in the training and
continuing education activities of critical incident stress management peers
and mental health professionals.
(2) The Nebraska State Patrol shall participate in the council and
committee, receive all initial requests for stress management sessions,
coordinate transportation requirements for critical incident stress management
team members, recruit members of the law enforcement profession in each region
to be trained as critical incident stress management peers, participate in the
training and continuing education activities of critical incident stress
management peers and mental health professionals, and appoint a member of the
patrol to each regional management committee.
(3) The State Fire Marshal shall participate in the council and committee,
cooperate in providing transportation for critical incident stress management
teams, recruit firefighters to be trained as critical incident stress
management peers in each critical incident stress management region,
participate in the training and continuing education activities of critical
incident stress management peers and mental health professionals, and appoint
an individual who is employed by the State Fire Marshal to be on each regional
management committee.
(4) The Nebraska Emergency Management Agency shall participate in the
council and committee, promote stress management planning as part of emergency
management preparedness, promote preincident education programs to acquaint
emergency service personnel with stress management techniques, and participate
in the training and continuing education activities of critical incident stress
management peers and mental health professionals.
(5) Until July 1, 2026, the department, patrol, State Fire Marshal, and
agency shall participate in the Critical Incident Stress Management Council and
the Interagency Management Committee.
Sec. 45. Section 71-7109, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
71-7109 The council shall appoint a statewide clinical director shall be
appointed by the Critical Incident Stress Management Council until July 1,
2026, and by the Department of Health and Human Services on and after July 1,
2026. The statewide clinical director shall be a member of the committee and,
working with the committee, shall supervise and evaluate the professional and
peer support team members, including the regional clinical directors, and until
July 1, 2026, shall be a member of and work with the Interagency Management
Committee for such purpose. The statewide clinical director may conduct
critical incident stress management training and continuing education
activities.
Sec. 46. Section 71-7110, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
71-7110 Each critical incident stress management region shall have a
regional management committee composed of representatives of the Department of
Health and Human Services, the State Fire Marshal, and the Nebraska State
Patrol and a regional clinical director. The regional clinical director shall
have a graduate degree in a mental health discipline. The regional management
committee shall be responsible for the implementation and coordination of the
program in the region according to the specifications developed by the Critical
Incident Stress Management Council council and Interagency Management Committee
prior to July 1, 2026, and developed by the department on and after July 1,
2026. The regional management committee shall develop critical incident stress
management teams to facilitate the stress management process.
Sec. 47. Section 72-811, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
72-811 For purposes of sections 72-811 to 72-818:
(1) Committee means: shall mean
(a) The the Vacant Building and Excess Land Committee prior to July 1,
2026; and
(b) The Department of Administrative Services beginning July 1, 2026;
(2) Excess, referring to land, means shall mean (a) unused in whole or in
part by any state agency for the purposes for which the land was acquired or
received or (b) without current defined plans by any state agency for the use
of the land for the agency's mission for the next fiscal year; and
(3) Vacant, referring to buildings, means shall mean (a) unoccupied, (b)
unused in whole or in part by any state agency for the purposes for which the
building was designed, intended, or remodeled, or (c) without current defined
plans by any state agency for the use of the building for the agency's mission
for the next fiscal year.
Sec. 48. Section 72-812, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
-17-

LB346 LB346
2025 2025
72-812 The Vacant Building and Excess Land Committee is hereby created.
The committee shall be composed of the Director of Administrative Services, the
State Building Administrator, and the administrator of the Task Force for
Building Renewal created pursuant to section 81-174. When reviewing and
considering action to be taken in regard to a particular building or piece of
land, the committee shall also include a representative of the state agency
responsible for the building or land as a nonvoting member.
The Vacant Building and Excess Land Committee terminates July 1, 2026.
This section terminates on July 1, 2026.
Sec. 49. Section 72-2101, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
72-2101 The Governor's Residence Advisory Commission is created. The
commission terminates on July 1, 2026. The commission shall conduct an annual
inspection of the Governor's residence. A report on the inspection shall be
submitted to the Governor within thirty days after the day of the inspection.
The report shall include recommendations for major maintenance or repair
projects, if needed. Implementation and priority of an approved major
maintenance or repair project shall be determined by the Governor in
cooperation with the Director of Administrative Services. Additionally, no
changes, additions, deletions, or other alterations to the residence, including
its exterior, interior, decorative objects, contents, or grounds shall be made
without the prior approval of the commission, except for the Governor's private
living quarters located on the second floor of the residence.
Sections 72-2101 to 72-2105 terminate on July 1, 2026.
Sec. 50. Section 81-1108.41, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-1108.41 (1) The division shall cause a state comprehensive capital
facilities plan to be developed. The plan shall project the state's facilities
needs for a period of six years and shall be based on programmatic projections
and input from each state agency. To aid in the development of the plan prior
to July 1, 2026, the Governor shall appoint a State Comprehensive Capital
Facilities Planning Committee with representatives from various state agencies,
and the . The committee shall develop and adopt comprehensive planning
guidelines and a process of project prioritization. The committee terminates on
July 1, 2026. Beginning July 1, 2026, the division shall be responsible for the
comprehensive planning guidelines and the process of project prioritization.
The state comprehensive capital facilities plan shall be submitted
electronically to the Committee on Building Maintenance for review before such
plan shall be submitted to the Governor and the Legislative Fiscal Analyst on
or before November 15 prior to the beginning of each biennium. The plan
submitted to the Legislative Fiscal Analyst shall be submitted electronically.
Prior to July 1, 2026, the The plan shall be based on priorities developed by
the State Comprehensive Capital Facilities Planning Committee. The University
of Nebraska and any Nebraska state college shall not be required to comply with
or be subject to the provisions of this section since these agencies are
subject to and participate in statewide facilities planning developed by the
Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education pursuant to the
Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education Act.
(2) An appropriation for drawings and construction may be made only after
submission of an acceptable program statement on or before September 15 of the
year previous to the initiation of such appropriation. Such program statement
shall include, but not be limited to, (a) an assessment of the compatibility of
the project with the state comprehensive capital facilities plan and the agency
or departmental comprehensive capital facilities plan, (b) the identification
of the impact of the project on the space utilization of other facilities under
the control of the agency or department, and (c) the identification of the
future impact on the agency or departmental programmatic needs, demand for
utilities in excess of current capacity, parking needs, street and road needs,
and site acquisition needs. Such program statement shall be submitted to the
division and the Legislative Fiscal Analyst. The program statement submitted to
the Legislative Fiscal Analyst shall be submitted electronically.
(3) No contract for the planning, design, or construction of a new
facility or major modification or repair of an existing facility provided for
by any state appropriation may be initiated unless an acceptable program
statement has been approved by the Governor, the agency or department has
submitted to the division a certificate from the Committee on Building
Maintenance that there is no state-owned property which is adequate or which
through cost-effective renovation, as determined by the division, could be made
adequate to meet the agency's or department's needs, and the conditions of the
contracts are approved in writing by the division, except that the provisions
of this section shall not apply to projects when the total design and
construction cost of the project is less than the limit established by the
division. Such program statements and contracts shall be reviewed by the
division.
(4) The division shall file a written report on each program statement and
contract reviewed with the Governor and the Legislative Fiscal Analyst. The
report submitted to the Legislative Fiscal Analyst shall be submitted
electronically. This report shall cover the consistency of the project with the
state comprehensive capital facilities plan and the agency or departmental
comprehensive capital facilities plan. A subsequent review and report upon
completion of the planning or design phase of the project shall indicate the
compatibility of the project with the agency or departmental comprehensive
capital facilities plan, compare the probable cost of the project with accepted
-18-

LB346 LB346
2025 2025
cost standards for similar construction projects, and review the relationship
of the project to other state agency or departmental capital facilities in the
same complex.
Sec. 51. Beginning July 1, 2026, the Department of Administrative
Services shall assume the duties of:
(1) The Suggestion Award Board; and
(2) The Vacant Building and Excess Land Committee.
Sec. 52. Section 81-1348, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
81-1348 There is hereby created the Suggestion Award Board. The membership
of such board shall consist of the Director of Personnel, the Director of
Administrative Services, the Auditor of Public Accounts or his or her designee,
and three persons, each to serve a term of three years, selected and appointed
by the Governor from the bargaining units listed in section 81-1373, except
that the first three appointments made after February 23, 2000, shall be for
terms of one year, two years, and three years, as designated by the Governor.
Of the persons selected from such bargaining units, one person shall be
selected from each of such bargaining units as follows:
(1) The first term from the bargaining units listed in subdivisions (1)
(a), (b), and (l) of such section;
(2) The second term from the bargaining units listed in subdivisions (1)
(c), (d), and (g) of such section;
(3) The third term from the bargaining units listed in subdivisions (1)
(e), (f), and (h) of such section; and
(4) The fourth term from the bargaining units listed in subdivisions (1)
(i), (j), and (k) of such section.
After the fourth term, the appointments shall be made starting from
subdivision (1) of this section and following the same sequence.
Whenever a vacancy occurs on the board for any reason, the Governor shall
appoint an individual to fill such vacancy from the same bargaining unit in
which the vacancy exists.
The members shall be reimbursed for expenses as provided in sections
81-1174 to 81-1177.
The board shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to aid in
carrying out sections 81-1350 and 81-1351.
The Suggestion Award Board terminates on July 1, 2026. This section
terminates on July 1, 2026.
Sec. 53. Section 81-1430, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
81-1430 (1) A task force is hereby established within the Nebraska
Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice for the purposes of
investigating and studying human trafficking, the methods for advertising human
trafficking services, and the victimization of individuals coerced to
participate in human trafficking. The task force terminates July 1, 2026.
(2) The task force shall examine the extent to which human trafficking is
prevalent in this state, the scope of efforts being taken to prevent human
trafficking from occurring, and the services available to victims of human
trafficking in this state. The task force shall utilize information and
research available from the Innocence Lost National Initiative. The task force
shall research and recommend a model of rehabilitative services for victims of
human trafficking that includes input from the areas of law enforcement, social
services, the legal profession, the judiciary, mental health, and immigration.
The task force shall also investigate the limitations upon victims who wish to
come forward and seek medical attention; investigate the potential to stop
human trafficking; and investigate the potential to promote recovery, to
protect families and children who may be profoundly impacted by such abuse, and
to save lives.
(3)(a) The Department of Labor shall work with the task force to develop
or select informational posters for placement around the state. The posters
shall be in English, Spanish, and any other language deemed appropriate by the
department task force. The posters shall include a toll-free telephone number a
person may call for assistance, preferably the National Human Trafficking
Resource Center Hotline (888)373-7888.
(b) Posters shall be placed in rest stops, strip clubs, and casinos. The
department task force shall work with local businesses and nonprofit entities
associated with the prevention of human trafficking to voluntarily place
additional signs in high schools, postsecondary educational institutions, gas
stations, hotels, hospitals, health care clinics, urgent care centers,
airports, train stations, bus stations, and other locations around the state
deemed appropriate by the department task force.
(c) Prior to July 1, 2026, the department shall work with the task force
to carry out this subsection.
(4) The task force shall consist of the following members:
(a) The Attorney General or his or her designee;
(b) The executive director of the Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement
and Criminal Justice;
(c) The Superintendent of Law Enforcement and Public Safety or his or her
designee;
(d) The Director of Correctional Services or his or her designee;
(e) The chief of police or director of public safety of a city of two
hundred thousand inhabitants or more as determined by the most recent federal
decennial census or the most recent revised certified count by the United
States Bureau of the Census;
-19-

LB346 LB346
2025 2025
(f) The chief of police or director of public safety of a city of less
than two hundred thousand inhabitants as determined by the most recent federal
decennial census or the most recent revised certified count by the United
States Bureau of the Census;
(g) A county sheriff;
(h) A county attorney;
(i) A county commissioner;
(j) A mayor or city manager;
(k) A person involved with the control or prevention of juvenile
delinquency;
(l) A person involved with the control or prevention of child abuse;
(m) The Commissioner of Education or his or her designee;
(n) The director of the Commission on Latino-Americans or his or her
designee; and
(o) Six members, at least three of whom shall be women, from the public at
large.
(5) The Governor shall appoint the members of the task force listed in
subdivisions (4)(e) through (l) and (o) of this section for terms as provided
in subsection (6) of this section. The membership of the task force shall
represent varying geographic areas and large and small political subdivisions.
One member from the public at large shall be a professional representing child
welfare, and one member of the public at large shall represent juvenile
pretrial diversion programs.
(6) The members of the task force appointed by the Governor shall serve
six-year terms, except that of the members first appointed, four shall serve
initial two-year terms, four shall serve initial four-year terms, and six shall
serve initial six-year terms from January 1 next succeeding their appointments.
Thereafter, all members shall serve six-year terms. A member may be reappointed
at the expiration of his or her term. Any vacancy occurring otherwise than by
expiration of a term shall be filled for the balance of the unexpired term in
the same manner as the original appointment.
(7) No member shall serve beyond the time when he or she holds the office,
employment, or status by reason of which he or she was initially eligible for
appointment. Any member of the task force appointed by the Governor may be
removed from the task force for cause upon notice and an opportunity to be
heard at a public hearing. One of the causes for removal shall be absence from
three regularly scheduled meetings of the task force during any six-month
period when the member has failed to advise the task force in advance of such
meeting that he or she will be absent and stating a reason therefor.
(8) The chairperson of the task force shall be designated by the Governor
to serve at the pleasure of the Governor. The chairperson shall be the chief
executive officer of the task force but may delegate such of his or her duties
to other members of the task force as may be authorized by the task force.
(9) Notwithstanding any provision of law, ordinance, or charter provision
to the contrary, membership on the task force shall not disqualify any member
from holding any other public office or employment or cause the forfeiture
thereof.
(10) The members of the task force shall serve on the task force without
compensation, but they shall be entitled to receive reimbursement for expenses
incurred incident to such service as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.
(11) Eleven members of the task force shall constitute a quorum for the
transaction of any business or the exercise of any power of the task force. The
task force shall have the power to act by a majority of the members present at
any meeting at which a quorum is in attendance.
(12) Every July 1 and December 1 until July 1, 2026, the task force shall
report electronically to the Clerk of the Legislature the results of its
investigation and study and its recommendations, if any, together with drafts
of legislation necessary to carry its recommendations into effect by filing the
report with the clerk.
Sec. 54. Section 81-1431, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
81-1431 (1) It is the intent of the Legislature that law enforcement
agencies, prosecutors, public defenders, judges, juvenile detention center
staff, and others involved in the juvenile justice system and the criminal
justice system and other relevant officials be provided mandatory training
regarding issues in human trafficking. Prior to July 1, 2026, the The task
force established in section 81-1430 shall work with such agencies, persons,
and staff to develop a proper curriculum for the training and to determine how
the training should be provided. The determination and accompanying legislative
recommendations shall be made by December 1, 2012. Such training shall focus
on:
(a) State and federal law regarding human trafficking;
(b) Methods used in identifying victims of human trafficking who are
United States citizens and foreign nationals, including preliminary interview
techniques and appropriate questioning methods;
(c) Methods for prosecuting human traffickers;
(d) Methods of increasing effective collaboration with nongovernmental
organizations and other relevant social service organizations in the course of
investigating and prosecuting a human trafficking case;
(e) Methods for protecting the rights of victims of human trafficking,
taking into account the need to consider human rights and the special needs of
women and minor victims;
(f) The necessity of treating victims of human trafficking as crime
-20-

LB346 LB346
2025 2025
victims rather than as criminals; and
(g) Methods for promoting the safety and well-being of all victims of
human trafficking.
(2) Prior to July 1, 2026, the The task force shall also seek the input
and participation of appropriate nongovernmental organizations and other
relevant organizations regarding the provision, preparation, and presentation
of the training called for in this section.
Sec. 55. Section 81-15,159.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-15,159.01 (1) The Department of Environment and Energy shall conduct a
study to examine the status of solid waste management programs operated by the
department and make recommendations to modernize and revise such programs. The
study shall include, but not be limited to: (a) Whether existing state programs
regarding litter and waste reduction and recycling should be amended or merged;
(b) a needs assessment of the recycling and composting programs in the state,
including the need for infrastructure development operating standards, market
development, coordinated public education resulting in behavior change, and
incentives to increase recycling and composting; (c) methods to partner with
political subdivisions, private industry, and private, nonprofit organizations
to most successfully address waste management issues in the state; (d)
recommendations regarding existing funding sources and possible new revenue
sources at the state and local level to address existing and emerging solid
waste management issues; and (e) revisions to existing grant programs to
address solid waste management issues in a proactive manner.
(2) The Director of Environment and Energy shall establish an advisory
committee to advise the department regarding the study described in this
section. The members of the advisory committee shall be appointed by the
director and shall include no more than nine members. The director shall
designate a chairperson of the advisory committee. The members shall receive no
compensation for their services. The advisory committee terminates on July 1,
2026.
(3) In addition to the advisory committee, the department may hire
consultants and special experts to assist in the study described in this
section. After completion of the study, the department shall submit a report,
including recommendations, to the Executive Board of the Legislative Council
and the chairpersons of the Natural Resources Committee, the Urban Affairs
Committee, and the Appropriations Committee of the Legislature no later than
December 15, 2017. The report shall be submitted electronically.
Sec. 56. Section 81-15,210, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-15,210 (1) The director of the Nebraska Emergency Management Agency
shall serve as the State Administrator of the Nebraska Emergency Planning and
Community Right to Know Act.
(2) The State Emergency Response Commission is created and shall be a part
of the Nebraska Emergency Management Agency for administrative purposes. The
commission terminates on July 1, 2026. Beginning July 1, 2026, the duties of
the commission under the Nebraska Emergency Planning and Community Right to
Know Act shall be carried out by the Nebraska Emergency Management Agency. The
membership of the commission shall include the Director of Environment and
Energy or his or her designee, the Director-State Engineer or his or her
designee, the Superintendent of Law Enforcement and Public Safety or his or her
designee, the State Fire Marshal or his or her designee, the director of the
Nebraska Emergency Management Agency or his or her designee, the chief
executive officer of the Department of Health and Human Services or his or her
designee, two elected officials or employees of municipal or county government,
and one citizen member to represent each of the following interest groups:
Firefighters, local emergency management, public or community health,
environmental protection, labor, school district, small business, agricultural
business, chemical industry, highway transportation, and rail transportation.
The Governor shall appoint the municipal or county government officials or
employees and the citizen members with the approval of the Legislature. The
appointments shall be made to represent the three congressional districts as
equally as possible.
(3) (2) The members appointed by the Governor shall be appointed for terms
of four years, except that of the first citizen members appointed, three
members shall serve for one-year terms, three members shall serve for two-year
terms, and two members shall serve for three-year terms, as designated at the
time of appointment.
(4) (3) A vacancy on the commission shall exist in the event of the death,
disability, or resignation of a member. Any member appointed to fill a vacancy
occurring prior to the expiration of the term for which his or her predecessor
was appointed shall be appointed by the Governor for the remainder of such
term.
Sec. 57. Section 81-15,238, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-15,238 For purposes of the Private Onsite Wastewater Treatment System
Contractors Certification and System Registration Act, the definitions in
sections 81-15,240 81-15,239 to 81-15,244 shall be used.
Sec. 58. Section 81-15,245, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-15,245 The Private Onsite Wastewater Treatment System Advisory
Committee is created. The advisory committee terminates on July 1, 2026. The
advisory committee shall be composed of the following eleven members:
-21-

LB346 LB346
2025 2025
(1) Seven members appointed by the director as follows:
(a) Five private onsite wastewater treatment system professionals; and
(b) Two registered environmental health specialists or officials
representing local public health departments which have established programs
for regulating private onsite wastewater treatment systems;
(2) The chief executive officer of the Department of Health and Human
Services or his or her designee;
(3) The Director of Environment and Energy or his or her designated
representative; and
(4) One representative with experience in soils and geology and one
representative with experience in biological engineering, both of whom shall be
designated by the vice chancellor of the University of Nebraska Institute of
Agriculture and Natural Resources.
Members shall be reimbursed for expenses as provided in sections 81-1174
to 81-1177. The department shall provide administrative support for the
advisory committee.
This section terminates on July 1, 2026.
Sec. 59. Section 81-15,246, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-15,246 Prior to July 1, 2026, the Private Onsite Wastewater Treatment
System Advisory Committee The advisory committee shall:
(1) Meet not less often than annually as determined by the director. The
director may call special meetings of the advisory committee;
(2) Advise the department on proposed rules and regulations relating to
the Private Onsite Wastewater Treatment System Contractors Certification and
System Registration Act;
(3) Advise the department on rules and regulations for the siting, layout,
operation, and maintenance of private onsite wastewater treatment systems; and
(4) Advise the department on the administration of the act as requested by
the director.
This section terminates on July 1, 2026.
Sec. 60. Section 82-703, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
82-703 (1) The Willa Cather National Statuary Hall Selection Committee is
created. The committee terminates on July 1, 2026. The committee shall consist
of members of the Nebraska Hall of Fame Commission created pursuant to section
72-724.
(2) Upon approval by the Joint Committee on the Library of Congress and
pursuant to the agreement described in section 82-702, the Willa Cather
National Statuary Hall Selection Committee shall:
(a) Select a sculptor to create a statue of Willa Cather to be placed in
the National Statuary Hall and review and approve the plans for the statue; and
(b) Identify a method to obtain necessary funding to pay for all of the
following. All funds shall be privately donated and separately managed. No
state funds shall be expended for such purposes:
(i) The sculptor for designing and carving or casting the statue;
(ii) The design and fabrication of the pedestal;
(iii) The transportation of the statue and pedestal to the United States
Capitol;
(iv) The removal and transportation of the replaced statue;
(v) The temporary placement of the new statue in the Rotunda of the United
States Capitol for the unveiling ceremony;
(vi) The unveiling ceremony; and
(vii) Any other expenses that the committee determines are necessary to
incur.
(3) The committee has the authority to receive and disburse gifts.
(4) The committee shall execute the requirements of this section no later
than June 30, 2023.
Sec. 61. Section 82-706, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
82-706 (1) The Chief Standing Bear National Statuary Hall Selection
Committee is created. The committee terminates on July 1, 2026. The committee
shall consist of (a) a representative of the Commission on Indian Affairs,
selected by the chairperson of the commission, (b) a member of the State-Tribal
Relations Committee of the Legislature, selected by the chairperson of the
committee, (c) the chairperson of the Lincoln Partners for Public Art
Development or its successor, and (d) the Historic Preservation Planner of the
City of Lincoln.
(2) Upon approval by the Joint Committee on the Library of Congress and
pursuant to the agreement described in section 82-705, the Chief Standing Bear
National Statuary Hall Selection Committee may:
(a) Select a sculptor to create a statue of Chief Standing Bear to be
placed in the National Statuary Hall and review and approve the plans for the
statue; and
(b) Identify a method to obtain necessary funding to pay for all of the
following. All funds shall be privately donated and separately managed. No
state funds shall be expended for such purposes:
(i) The sculptor for designing and carving or casting the statue;
(ii) The design and fabrication of the pedestal;
(iii) The transportation of the statue and pedestal to the United States
Capitol;
(iv) The removal and transportation of the replaced statue;
(v) The temporary placement of the new statue in the Rotunda of the United
-22-

LB346 LB346
2025 2025
States Capitol for the unveiling ceremony;
(vi) The unveiling ceremony; and
(vii) Any other expenses that the committee determines are necessary to
incur.
(3) The committee has the authority to receive and disburse gifts.
(4) The committee shall execute the requirements of this section no later
than June 30, 2023.
Sec. 62. Section 85-1008, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
85-1008 (1) To assist the center in carrying out its purposes and
functions prior to July 1, 2026, the Board of Regents may establish a Nebraska
Safety Center Advisory Council composed of the following members:
(a) One representative from the Department of Transportation;
(b) One representative from the Department of Motor Vehicles;
(c) One representative from the State Department of Education;
(d) One representative from the Game and Parks Commission;
(e) One representative from the Department of Labor;
(f) One person representing the community college areas;
(g) One person representing private business and industry;
(h) One person representing the University of Nebraska;
(i) One person representing the medical profession;
(j) One person representing the area of law enforcement in this state;
(k) One person representing the Safety Council of Nebraska, Inc.;
(l) One person representing the area of transportation;
(m) One person representative of emergency medical services;
(n) One person representing the judiciary in the State of Nebraska;
(o) One person representing city government;
(p) One person representing county government;
(q) One person representing the area of agriculture;
(r) One person representing the local public school system;
(s) One person representing fire safety;
(t) One representative of the Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary
Education;
(u) One person representing the Red Cross; and
(v) One person representing the state colleges.
(2) Representatives selected to serve on the council shall have
appropriate education, training, and experience in the field of fire safety,
industrial safety, recreational safety, domestic safety, or traffic safety.
(3) The Nebraska Safety Center Advisory Council terminates on July 1,
2026. This section terminates on July 1, 2026.
Sec. 63. Section 85-1607, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
85-1607 (1) Until July 1, 2026, the The board shall appoint an advisory
council of six representatives of private postsecondary career schools. Members
of the council shall include representatives from a business school, a trade or
technical school, a better business bureau, and three other distinct areas of
education. Members of the council shall serve staggered terms of three years
each as established by the board at the time of initial appointment. If a
vacancy occurs on the council, the board shall appoint a successor in the same
category as the predecessor. The advisory council shall have the following
responsibilities:
(a) (1) To advise the department in its administration of the Private
Postsecondary Career School Act; and
(b) (2) To review the rules and regulations adopted or proposed for
adoption by the department and make recommendations with respect thereto.
(2) The advisory council created pursuant to this section terminates on
July 1, 2026. This section terminates on July 1, 2026.
Sec. 64. Section 85-1643, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
85-1643 (1) The Private Postsecondary Career Schools Cash Fund is created.
All fees collected pursuant to the Private Postsecondary Career School Act
shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the fund. The fund shall
be used only for the purpose of administering the act. No fees shall be subject
to refund.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, fees collected
pursuant to the act shall be the following:
(a) Initial application for authorization to operate, two hundred dollars
plus twenty dollars per program of study offered;
(b) Renewal application for authorization to operate, one hundred dollars
plus twenty dollars per program of study offered, except that the board may
establish a variable fee schedule based upon the prior school year's gross
tuition revenue as provided by the school pursuant to section 85-1656;
(c) Approval to operate a branch facility, one hundred dollars;
(d) Late submission of application, fifty dollars;
(e) Initial agent's permit, fifty dollars;
(f) Agent's permit renewal, twenty dollars;
(g) Accreditation or reaccreditation, one hundred dollars;
(h) Initial authorization to award an associate degree, one hundred
dollars;
(i) Significant program change, fifty dollars;
(j) Change of name or location, twenty-five dollars; and
(k) Additional new program, one hundred dollars.
(3) Fees for out-of-state schools may include, but shall not exceed the
-23-

LB346 LB346
2025 2025
following:
(a) Certificate of approval to recruit, five hundred dollars annually;
(b) Initial agent's permit, one hundred dollars; and
(c) Agent's permit renewal, forty dollars.
(4)(a) Prior to July 1, 2026, the The board shall consult with the
advisory council established pursuant to section 85-1607 regarding any increase
in fees under the act. The board Beginning with fiscal year 2006-07 and each
year thereafter, the board in consultation with the advisory council shall
establish fees sufficient to cover the total cost of administration, except
that such fees shall not exceed one hundred ten percent of the previous year's
total cost. Such fees shall be set out in the rules and regulations adopted and
promulgated by the board.
(b) Total cost of administration shall be determined by an annual audit
of:
(i) Salaries and benefits or portions thereof for those department
employees who administer the act;
(ii) Operating costs such as rent, utilities, and supplies;
(iii) Capital costs such as office equipment, computer hardware, and
computer software;
(iv) Costs for travel by employees of the department, including car
rental, gas, and mileage charges; and
(v) Other reasonable and necessary costs as determined by the board.
Sec. 65. Section 86-511, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
86-511 Technical panel means:
(1) Prior to July 1, 2026, the panel created in section 86-521; and .
(2) Beginning July 1, 2026, the commission.
Sec. 66. Section 86-516, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
86-516 The commission shall:
(1) Annually by July 1, adopt policies and procedures used to develop,
review, and annually update a statewide technology plan;
(2) Create an information technology clearinghouse to identify and share
best practices and new developments, as well as identify existing problems and
deficiencies;
(3) Review and adopt policies to provide incentives for investments in
information technology infrastructure services;
(4) Determine a broad strategy and objectives for developing and
sustaining information technology development in Nebraska, including long-range
funding strategies, research and development investment, support and
maintenance requirements, and system usage and assessment guidelines;
(5) Adopt guidelines regarding project planning and management and
administrative and technical review procedures involving state-owned or state-
supported technology and infrastructure. Governmental entities, state agencies,
and noneducation political subdivisions shall submit all projects which use any
combination of general funds, federal funds, or cash funds for information
technology purposes to the process established by sections 86-512 to 86-524.
The commission may adopt policies that establish the format and minimum
requirements for project submissions. The commission may monitor the progress
of any such project and may require progress reports;
(6) Adopt minimum technical standards, guidelines, and architectures upon
recommendation by the technical panel. Such standards and guidelines shall not
unnecessarily restrict the use of new technologies or prevent commercial
competition, including competition with Network Nebraska;
(7) Establish ad hoc technical advisory groups to study and make
recommendations on specific topics, including workgroups to establish,
coordinate, and prioritize needs for education, local communities,
intergovernmental data communications, and state agencies;
(8) By November 15 of each even-numbered year, make recommendations on
technology investments to the Governor and the Legislature, including a
prioritized list of projects, reviewed by the technical panel pursuant to
section 86-521. The recommendations submitted to the Legislature shall be
submitted electronically;
(9) Approve grants from the Community Technology Fund and Government
Technology Collaboration Fund;
(10) Adopt schedules and procedures for reporting needs, priorities, and
recommended projects;
(11) Assist the Chief Information Officer in developing and maintaining
Network Nebraska pursuant to section 86-5,100; and
(12) Determine the format that state agencies, boards, and commissions
shall use to report their information technology plans under section 86-524.01.
The commission shall include an analysis of such plans in the statewide
technology plan; and .
(13) Beginning July 1, 2026, assume the duties of the technical panel.
Sec. 67. Section 86-521, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
86-521 (1) A technical panel is created. The technical panel shall be
comprised of one representative from the Nebraska Educational
Telecommunications Commission, one representative from the office of Chief
Information Officer, one representative from the University of Nebraska
Computing Services Network, and such other members as specified by the Nebraska
Information Technology Commission.
(2) The technical panel shall review any technology project presented to
-24-

LB346 LB346
2025 2025
the Nebraska Information Technology Commission including any recommendations by
working groups established under sections 86-512 to 86-524. Upon the conclusion
of the review of a technology project or request for additional funding, the
technical panel shall provide its analysis to the commission. The technical
panel may recommend technical standards and guidelines to be considered for
adoption by the commission.
(3) The technical panel terminates on July 1, 2026. The Nebraska
Information Technology Commission shall assume the powers and duties of the
technical panel on July 1, 2026.
Sec. 68. Section 86-1101, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
86-1101 The Legislature finds and declares that:
(1) The availability, quality, and affordability of broadband
telecommunications service is important to the residents of Nebraska; and
(2) Because availability, quality, and affordability of broadband
telecommunications service is lacking in certain rural areas in Nebraska,
combined with greater investment in urban areas, the state may be facing a
digital divide.
It is the intent of the Legislature that broadband telecommunications
service in rural areas of the state should be comparable in download and upload
speed and price to urban areas in the state where possible and that state
resources should be utilized to ensure that the rural residents of the state
should not be penalized simply because of their rural residence. It is further
the intent of the Legislature that the residents of this state should have
access to broadband telecommunications service at a minimum download speed of
one hundred megabits per second and a minimum upload speed of one hundred
megabits per second.
This section terminates on July 1, 2026.
Sec. 69. Section 86-1102, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
86-1102 (1) The Rural Broadband Task Force is hereby created. The task
force terminates on July 1, 2026. Task force members shall include the
chairperson of the Transportation and Telecommunications Committee of the
Legislature and a member of the Legislature selected by the Executive Board of
the Legislative Council who shall both serve as nonvoting, ex officio members,
a member of the Public Service Commission who shall be selected by the
chairperson of such commission, the chairperson of the Nebraska Information
Technology Commission or his or her designee who shall act as chairperson of
the task force, the Director of Economic Development or his or her designee,
the Director of Agriculture or his or her designee, and the following members
to be appointed by the Governor: A representative of the agribusiness
community, a representative of the Nebraska business community, a
representative of the regulated wireline telecommunications industry, a
representative of the wireless telecommunications industry, a representative of
the public power industry, a representative of health care providers, a
representative of Nebraska postsecondary educational institutions, and a
representative of rural schools offering kindergarten through grade twelve. The
members appointed by the Governor shall serve for a term of two years and may
be reappointed.
(2) The task force may appoint advisory groups to assist the task force in
providing technical expertise and advice on any issue. The advisory groups may
be composed of representatives of stakeholder groups which may include, but not
necessarily be limited to, representatives from small and large wireline
companies, wireless companies, public power districts, electric cooperative
corporations, cable television companies, Internet service providers, low-
income telecommunications and electric utility customers, health care
providers, and representatives of educational sectors. No compensation or
expense reimbursement shall be provided to any member of any advisory group
appointed by the task force.
(3) The Nebraska Information Technology Commission shall provide staff
assistance to the task force in consultation with staff from the Public Service
Commission and other interested parties. The task force may hire consultants to
assist in carrying out its duties. The task force shall review issues relating
to availability, adoption, and affordability of broadband services in rural
areas of Nebraska. In particular, the task force shall:
(a) Determine how Nebraska rural areas compare to neighboring states and
the rest of the nation in average download and upload speeds and in
subscription rates to higher speed tiers, when available;
(b) Examine the role of the Nebraska Telecommunications Universal Service
Fund in bringing comparable and affordable broadband services to rural
residents and any effect of the fund in deterring or delaying capital
formation, broadband competition, and broadband deployment;
(c) Review the feasibility of alternative technologies and providers in
accelerating access to faster and more reliable broadband service for rural
residents;
(d) Examine alternatives for deployment of broadband services to areas
that remain unserved or underserved, such as funding redirection programs
described in section 86-330, public-private partnerships, funding for
competitive deployment, and other measures, and make recommendations to the
Public Service Commission to encourage deployment in such areas;
(e) Recommend state policies to effectively utilize state universal
service fund dollars to leverage federal universal service fund support and
other federal funding;
-25-

LB346 LB346
2025 2025
(f) Make recommendations to the Governor and Legislature as to the most
effective and efficient ways that federal broadband rural infrastructure funds
received after July 1, 2018, should be expended if such funds become available;
and
(g) Determine other issues that may be pertinent to the purpose of the
task force.
(4) Task force members shall serve on the task force without compensation
but shall be entitled to receive reimbursement for expenses incurred for such
service as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.
(5) The task force shall meet at the call of the chairperson and shall
present its findings in a report to the Executive Board of the Legislative
Council no later than November 1, 2019, and by November 1 every odd-numbered
year thereafter. The report shall be submitted electronically.
(6) For purposes of this section, broadband services means high-speed
telecommunications capability at a minimum download speed of one hundred
megabits per second and a minimum upload speed of one hundred megabits per
second, and that enables users to originate and receive high-quality voice,
data, and video telecommunications using any technology.
Sec. 70. Section 86-1103, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
86-1103 The Rural Broadband Task Force Fund is created. The fund shall be
used to carry out the purposes of the Rural Broadband Task Force as described
in section 86-1102. For administrative purposes, the fund shall be located in
the Nebraska Information Technology Commission. The fund shall consist of money
appropriated or transferred by the Legislature and gifts, grants, or bequests
from any source, including federal, state, public, and private sources. Any
money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state
investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the
Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
The Rural Broadband Task Force Fund terminates on July 1, 2026. The State
Treasurer shall transfer any money remaining in the fund on such date to the
General Fund.
Sec. 71. Section 74 of this act becomes operative on July 1, 2026. The
other sections of this act become operative on their effective date.
Sec. 72. Original sections 2-1801, 2-1803, 2-1826, 2-4901, 2-5001,
2-5003, 38-204, 38-205, 38-308, 38-310, 38-605, 38-703, 38-904, 38-2213,
38-2214, 38-2306, 66-1605, 66-1618, 71-705, 71-706, 71-814, 71-815, 71-2454.01,
71-5311, 71-7102, 71-7107, 71-7108, 71-7109, 71-7110, 72-811, 72-812, 72-2101,
81-1108.41, 81-1348, 81-1430, 81-1431, 81-15,159.01, 81-15,210, 81-15,238,
81-15,245, 81-15,246, 82-703, 82-706, 85-1008, 85-1607, 85-1643, 86-511,
86-516, 86-521, 86-1101, 86-1102, and 86-1103, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, and sections 38-167, 38-2120, 38-2216, 39-2106, 39-2301.01, 39-2304,
43-3401, 43-4001, 43-4203, 43-4216, 43-4406, 43-4513, 66-2001, 71-702, 71-5301,
71-5310, and 71-7012, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are
repealed.
Sec. 73. The following sections are outright repealed: Sections 38-2307,
43-4003, 50-601, 50-602, 50-603, 66-1617, 71-4501, 71-4502, 71-4503, and
81-15,239, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and section 71-4504, Revised
Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024.
Sec. 74. The following sections are outright repealed: Sections 38-206,
71-7105, and 71-7106, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska.
-26-